Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-219
Pounds; power to establish; operation.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to provide for the erection of all needful pens, pounds, and buildings for the use of the city, within or without such city limits, to appoint and compensate keepers thereof, and to establish and enforce rules governing such pens, pounds, and buildings.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXIII, p. 133;

R.S.1913, § 4433;

C.S.1922, § 3817;

C.S.1929, § 15-220;

R.S.1943, § 15-219;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 36.